installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.aff
SFX A Y 764
SFX A   ist         tu         cist
SFX A   ist         tes        cist
SFX A   ist         te         cist
SFX A   ist         teme       cist
SFX A   ist         tete       cist
SFX A   ist         tou        cist
SFX A   ist         ti         cist
SFX A   ist         teme       cist
SFX A   ist         tete       cist
SFX A   ist         etl        cist
SFX A   ist         etla       cist
SFX A   ist         etlo       cist
SFX A   ist         etli       cist
SFX A   ist         etly       cist
SFX A   ist         ta         cist
SFX A   ist         touc       cist
SFX A   ist         touce      cist
SFX A   ist         etu        [dnt]ist
SFX A   ist         etes       [dnt]ist
SFX A   ist         ete        [dnt]ist
SFX A   ist         eteme      [dnt]ist
SFX A   ist         etete      [dnt]ist
SFX A   ist         etou       [dnt]ist
SFX A   ist         et         [dnt]ist
SFX A   ist         etme       [dnt]ist
SFX A   ist         ette       [dnt]ist
SFX A   ist         etl        [dnt]ist
SFX A   ist         etla       [dnt]ist
SFX A   ist         etlo       [dnt]ist
SFX A   ist         etli       [dnt]ist
SFX A   ist         etly       [dnt]ist
SFX A   ist         eta        [dnt]ist
SFX A   ist         etouc      [dnt]ist
SFX A   ist         etouce     [dnt]ist
SFX A   ist         edu        [^cdnt]ist
SFX A   ist         edes       [^cdnt]ist
SFX A   ist         ede        [^cdnt]ist
SFX A   ist         edeme      [^cdnt]ist
SFX A   ist         edete      [^cdnt]ist
SFX A   ist         edou       [^cdnt]ist
SFX A   ist         ed         [^cdnt]ist
SFX A   ist         edme       [^cdnt]ist
SFX A   ist         edte       [^cdnt]ist
SFX A   ist         edl        [^cdnt]ist
SFX A   ist         edla       [^cdnt]ist
SFX A   ist         edlo       [^cdnt]ist
SFX A   ist         edli       [^cdnt]ist
SFX A   ist         edly       [^cdnt]ist
SFX A   ist         eda        [^cdnt]ist
SFX A   ist         edouc      [^cdnt]ist
SFX A   ist         edouce     [^cdnt]ist
SFX A   est         esu        nest
SFX A   est         eses       nest
SFX A   est         ese        nest
SFX A   est         eseme      nest
SFX A   est         esete      nest
SFX A   est         esou       nest
SFX A   est         es         nest
SFX A   est         esme       nest
SFX A   est         este       nest
SFX A   est         esl        nest
SFX A   est         esla       nest
SFX A   est         eslo       nest
SFX A   est         esli       nest
SFX A   est         esly       nest
SFX A   est         esa        nest
SFX A   est         esouc      nest
SFX A   est         esouce     nest
SFX A   est         etu        [^n]est
SFX A   est         etes       [^n]est
SFX A   est         ete        [^n]est
SFX A   est         eteme      [^n]est
SFX A   est         etete      [^n]est
SFX A   est         etou       [^n]est
SFX A   est         et         [^n]est
SFX A   est         etme       [^n]est
SFX A   est         ette       [^n]est
SFX A   est         etl        [^n]est
SFX A   est         etla       [^n]est
SFX A   est         etlo       [^n]est
SFX A   est         etli       [^n]est
SFX A   est         etly       [^n]est
SFX A   est         eta        [^n]est
SFX A   est         etouc      [^n]est
SFX A   est         etouce     [^n]est
SFX A   ast         adu        ast
SFX A   ast         ades       ast
SFX A   ast         ade        ast
SFX A   ast         ademe      ast
SFX A   ast         adete      ast
SFX A   ast         adou       ast
SFX A   ast         ad         ast
SFX A   ast         adme       ast
SFX A   ast         adte       ast
SFX A   ast         adl        ast
SFX A   ast         adla       ast
SFX A   ast         adlo       ast
SFX A   ast         adli       ast
SFX A   ast         adly       ast
SFX A   ast         ada        ast
SFX A   ast         adouc      ast
SFX A   ast         adouce     ast
SFX A   ezt         ezu        ezt
SFX A   ezt         ezes       ezt
SFX A   ezt         eze        ezt
SFX A   ezt         ezeme      ezt
SFX A   ezt         ezete      ezt
SFX A   ezt         ezou       ezt
SFX A   ezt         ez         ezt
SFX A   ezt         ezme       ezt
SFX A   ezt         ezte       ezt
SFX A   ezt         ezl        ezt
SFX A   ezt         ezla       ezt
SFX A   ezt         ezlo       ezt
SFX A   ezt         ezli       ezt
SFX A   ezt         ezly       ezt
SFX A   ezt         eza        ezt
SFX A   ezt         ezouc      ezt
SFX A   ezt         ezouce     ezt
SFX A   rat         eru        rat
SFX A   rat         eres       rat
SFX A   rat         ere        rat
SFX A   rat         ereme      rat
SFX A   rat         erete      rat
SFX A   rat         erou       rat
SFX A   rat         er         rat
SFX A   rat         erme       rat
SFX A   rat         erte       rat
SFX A   rat         era        rat
SFX A   rat         erouc      rat
SFX A   rat         erouce     rat
SFX A   lat         elu        lat
SFX A   lat         eles       lat
SFX A   lat         ele        lat
SFX A   lat         eleme      lat
SFX A   lat         elete      lat
SFX A   lat         elou       lat
SFX A   lat         el         lat
SFX A   lat         elme       lat
SFX A   lat         elte       lat
SFX A   lat         ela        lat
SFX A   lat         elouc      lat
SFX A   lat         elouce     lat
SFX A   at          u          [^lr]at
SFX A   at          es         [^lr]at
SFX A   at          e          [^lr]at
SFX A   at          eme        [^lr]at
SFX A   at          ete        [^lr]at
SFX A   at          ou         [^lr]at
SFX A   at          i          [^lr]at
SFX A   at          eme        [^lr]at
SFX A   at          ete        [^lr]at
SFX A   at          al         at
SFX A   at          ala        at
SFX A   at          alo        at
SFX A   at          ali        at
SFX A   at          aly        at
SFX A   t           i          ct
SFX A   i           t          ci
SFX A   ect         ecu        ec[it]
SFX A   ect         eku        ec[it]
SFX A   ect         eces       ec[it]
SFX A   ect         ece        ec[it]
SFX A   ect         eceme      ec[it]
SFX A   ect         ecete      ec[it]
SFX A   ect         ecou       ec[it]
SFX A   ect         ekou       ec[it]
SFX A   ect         ec         ec[it]
SFX A   ect         ec         ec[it]
SFX A   ect         ecme       ec[it]
SFX A   ect         ecme       ec[it]
SFX A   ect         ecte       ec[it]
SFX A   ect         ecte       ec[it]
SFX A   ect         ekl        [^l]ec[it]
SFX A   ect         ekla       [^l]ec[it]
SFX A   ect         eklo       [^l]ec[it]
SFX A   ect         ekli       [^l]ec[it]
SFX A   ect         ekly       [^l]ec[it]
SFX A   ect         eka        [^l]ec[it]
SFX A   ect         ekouc      [^l]ec[it]
SFX A   ect         ekouce     [^l]ec[it]
SFX A   ouct        ucu        ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uku        ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uces       ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uce        ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uceme      ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        ucete      ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        ucou       ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        ukou       ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uc         ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uc         ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        ucme       ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        ucme       ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        ucte       ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        ucte       ouc[it]
SFX A   ct          kl         ouc[it]
SFX A   ct          kla        ouc[it]
SFX A   ct          klo        ouc[it]
SFX A   ct          kli        ouc[it]
SFX A   ct          kly        ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uka        ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        ukouc      ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        ukouce     ouc[it]
SFX A   ci          hu         oc[it]
SFX A   oci         uzu        oc[it]
SFX A   oci         uzes       oc[it]
SFX A   oci         uze        oc[it]
SFX A   oci         uzeme      oc[it]
SFX A   oci         uzete      oc[it]
SFX A   ci          hou        oc[it]
SFX A   oci         uzou       oc[it]
SFX A   ci          hl         oc[it]
