installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.dic
aktivovat/ATN
apretovat/ATN
bacnout/ATN
bezet/ATN
bojkotovat/ATN
brouknout/ATN
centrovat/ATN
cuknout/AN
cilit/AN
decentrovat/ATN
dekrementovat/ATN
deregulovat/ATN
dilatovat/ATN
dmychavat/ATN
dobrousit/ACN
docistit/ACN
doeditovat/ATN
dohlucet/AN
dohystercit/AN
doklepat/AJTN
dokosit/ATN
dokumetovat/ATN
dolitnout/AN
domerovat/ATN
donutit/ACN
dopeskovat/ATN
doposlechnout/ATN
doradit/ATN
doredit/ATN
doskucet/AN
dostavet/AJTN
dosyckovat/AN
dosponovat/ATN
dotitulkovat/ATN
douctovat/ATN
dovolit/ATN
dozdobit/ATN
drazkovat/ATN
durdit/AN
etablovat/ATN
falcovat/ATN
flamovat/AN
fuzovat/AN
hafnout/AN
heverovat/ATN
holit/ATN
hromadit/ATN
hvezdickovat/ATN
chranit/ATN
iluminovat/ATN
injikovat/ATN
invalidizovat/ATN
jizvit/ATN
kapalnet/AJN
klasifikovat/ATN
klovnout/ATN
kolonizovat/ATN
konfirmovat/ATN
konzumovat/ATN
koulet/AJTN
krojovat/ATN
krtit/ATN
kverulovat/ATN
lapit/ATN
lezet/AN
lomit/ATN
malovat/ATN
mechovatet/AJN
mizet/AN
mracit/ATN
mythisovat/ATN
nacestovat/ATN
nadechovat/ATN
nadrbat/AJTN
naformulovat/ATN
nahustovat/ATN
naklepnout/ATN
nakrcit/ATN
nalahvovat/ATN
naloupit/ATN
namorit/ATN
napechovat/ATN
naporizovat/ATN
narezirovat/ATN
naschnout/AN
nastavit/ATN
nasvecovat/ATN
nastepovat/ATN
natrit/ATN
navlhnout/ATN
nazrat/ATN
nostrifikovat/ATN
obestrit/ATN
obkovat/AJTN
obloudit/ACN
obroubit/ATN
obtahovat/ATN
ocadit/ACN
odblokovat/ATN
odclenovat/ATN
odfiknout/ATN
odhodit/ACN
odkaslat/ATN
odkracet/AJTN
odlehnout/ATN
odmastit/ACN
odmyslet/AN
odpichovat/ATN
odpolitizovat/ATN
odrezovat/ATN
odsignalizovat/ATN
odstrcit/ATN
odsoupnout/ATN
odtlouct/ATN
odvdecit/ATN
odvzdusnovat/ATN
ohlednout/AN
ochocit/ATN
okolkovat/ATN
okusovat/ATN
omilostnovat/ATN
opatrovat/ATN
oplostit/ATN
oprotektorovat/ATN
osamet/AJN
osmelit/ATN
osvitit/ACN
oteplit/ATN
ovencit/ATN
oznamit/ATN
paketovat/ATN
parovat/ATN
penetrovat/ATN
placnout/ATN
plouzit/AN
poctit/ATN
podfakturovat/ATN
podletet/ATN
podrazit/ACXN
podsunovat/ATN
pogumovat/ATN
pohryzat/AJTN
pokacet/AJTN
pokratit/ACN
polepsit/ATN
pomazlit/ATN
ponorit/ATN
poplavu/A
porakoustit/ATN
posednout/ATN
posterizovat/ATN
posvetit/ACN
potit/ACN
povazit/ATN
povzbuzovat/ATN
pozvednout/ATN
preparovat/ATN
procitnout/AN
produkovat/ATN
prohnojit/ATN
prokadrovat/ATN
prokovit/ATXN
prolistovat/ATN
promlcovat/ATN
proplachtit/AN
prorezat/AJTN
prosolit/ATN
prosaskovat/ATN
proteplit/ATN
provazit/ATN
prozvonit/ATN
prebrusovat/ATN
predderovat/ATN
predkroutit/ACN
predprogramovat/ATN
predtancit/ATN
preformovat/ATN
prehrazovat/ATN
preklepnout/ATN
prekrocit/ATN
prelanarit/AN
premazat/ATN
preorganizovat/ATN
preplouzit/AN
prerusovat/ATN
presladit/ACN
presunout/ATN
pretacet/AJTN
pretrumfnout/ATN
prevlacet/AJTN
prezvykovat/ATN
pridratovat/ATN
priinstalovat/ATN
prikreslovat/ATN
primacknout/ATN
pripamatovat/ATN
pripojit/ATN
priskakovat/AN
pristrihovat/ATN
pritancit/ATN
privazat/ATN
prizvukovat/AN
pytlovat/ATN
rebilancovat/ATN
reprezentovat/ATN
rozblatit/ACN
rozednit/AN
rozchuravet/AJTN
rozletnout/AN
roznozit/ATN
rozpulsovat/AN
rozskvarit/ATN
rozvazovat/ATN
rymovat/ATN
scesat/AJTN
sesmolit/ATN
sflikovat/ATN
skandalisovat/ATN
sladovat/ATN
smirovat/ATN
sparovat/ATN
spoluvladnout/ATN
sterilizovat/ATN
stvrdit/ACN
svrastit/ATN
skrabat/AJTN
studovat/ATN
tipnout/ATN
trknout/ATN
ubrebentit/ACN
uhoret/ATN
ukovat/AJTN
umorovat/ATN
upravovovat/ATN
uskutecnovat/ATN
uskvarit/ATN
utuzovat/ATN
vadit/AN
veset/AJTN
vlect/ATN
vplynout/ATN
vtelit/ATN
vybuchnout/ATN
vydojit/ATN
vyhmatnout/ATN
vyjezdit/ATN
vykrocit/ATN
vyloucit/ATN
vynahradit/ACN
vyplizit/AN
vypuzovat/ATN
vyskytovat/AN
vystrihnout/ACN
vystafirovat/ATN
vytrit/ATN
vyvysovat/ATN
vzlitnout/AN
zablokovat/ATN
zacernovat/ATN
zahanbit/ATN
zachladit/ACN
zaklonit/ATN
zaktivovat/ATN
zamaskovat/ATN
zaodporovat/AN
zapolit/AN
zarypat/AJTN
zasrat/ATN
zasmiknout/ATN
zatraktivnit/ATN
zavirblovat/AN
zazehovat/ATN
zcerit/ATN
zduplikovat/ATN
zevsednovat/ATN
zhudebnit/ATN
zjizvit/ATN
zkostnatet/AJN
zlepsovat/ATN
zmlazovat/ATN
zneklidnet/AJTN
znovuobjevovat/ATN
zpecetit/ATN
zproblematizovat/ATN
zrealizovat/ATN
ztemnit/ATN
zustavit/ATN
zvrznout/ATN
